Utah statutes.
17-27a-511.    Termination of a billboard and associated rights.
(1)  A county may only require termination of a billboard and associated
property rights through:
(a)  gift;
(b)  purchase;
(c)  agreement;
(d)  exchange; or
(e)  eminent domain.
(2)  A termination under Subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), or (d) requires the
voluntary consent of the billboard owner.
